Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 6 System of Certified Stroke Centers

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 1102, § 1/SB 549, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Coverdell-Murphy Act’ in honor of the late Georgia Congressman Paul D. Coverdell and the late Georgia Speaker of the House of Representatives Thomas B. Murphy, both revered politicians of the great State of Georgia, and victims of massive strokes.”

31-11-110.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds and declares that:

The rapid identification, diagnosis, and treatment of stroke can save the lives of stroke patients and in some cases can reverse neurological damage such as paralysis and speech and language impairments, leaving stroke patients with few or no neurological deficits;

Despite significant advances in diagnosis, treatment, and prevention, stroke is the fifth leading cause of death and the number one cause of disability in this country; an estimated 800,000 new and recurrent strokes occur each year in this country, and with the aging of the population, the number of persons who have strokes is projected to increase;

Although new treatments are available to improve the clinical outcomes of stroke, many acute care hospitals often face challenges in obtaining staff and equipment required to optimally triage and treat stroke patients, including the provision of optimal, safe, and effective emergency care for these patients;

Although the Georgia Coverdell Acute Stroke Registry currently exists within the Department of Public Health as a program whose purpose is to increase improvement of the quality of acute stroke care through collaborative efforts with participating hospitals in this state, less than one-third of Georgia’s hospitals are currently enrolled in the program. Therefore, increased participation in and funding of this program in conjunction with the adherence to the tenets of this article would have profound effects on the quality of care for acute stroke patients in this state;

An effective system to support stroke survival is needed in our communities in order to treat stroke patients in a timely manner and to improve the overall treatment of stroke patients in order to increase survival and decrease the disabilities associated with stroke. There is a public health need for acute care hospitals in this state to establish stroke centers to ensure the rapid triage, diagnostic evaluation, and treatment of patients suffering a stroke;

At least three levels of stroke centers should be established for the treatment of acute stroke:

Comprehensive stroke centers should be established in hospitals to provide complete and specialized care to patients who experience the most complex strokes, which require specialized testing, highly technical procedures, and other interventions, and to provide education and guidance to primary and remote treatment stroke centers;

Primary stroke centers should be established in as many acute care hospitals as possible to evaluate, stabilize, and provide or arrange for treatment, care, and rehabilitative services to patients diagnosed with acute stroke; and

Remote treatment stroke centers should be established to evaluate, stabilize, and provide treatment to patients diagnosed with acute stroke in rural and other underserved areas of the state, because access to stroke care is limited in these areas due to the limited availability of professional specialists, high-tech imaging equipment, and transportation services;

Coordination between stroke centers should be encouraged through the establishment of coordinated stroke care agreements; and

Therefore, it is in the best interest of the residents of this state to establish a program to identify certified stroke centers throughout the state, to provide specific patient care and support services criteria that stroke centers must meet in order to ensure that stroke patients receive safe and effective care, and to provide financial support to acute care hospitals to encourage them to develop stroke centers in all areas of the state. Further, it is in the best interest of the people of this state to modify the state’s emergency medical response system to assure that stroke patients may be quickly identified and transported to and treated in facilities that have specialized programs for providing timely and effective treatment for stroke patients.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-11-110

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 1102, § 2/SB 549; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2016, p. 438, § 1/HB 853; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 31/HB 323.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in paragraphs (2) and (4) and subparagraph (6)(A).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, in paragraph (5), “a” was deleted following “increase survival and” in the first sentence, and a comma was inserted following “evaluation” in the second sentence.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 438, § 2/HB 853, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The department shall begin the rulemaking process to effect the provisions of this Act no later than June 30, 2016.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-11-111.
“Department” defined.

As used in this article, the term “department” means the same state agency or state board which regulates emergency medical services personnel and providers pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-11-111

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 1102, § 2/SB 549; Ga. L. 2016, p. 438, § 1/HB 853.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 438, § 2/HB 853, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The department shall begin the rulemaking process to effect the provisions of this Act no later than June 30, 2016.”

31-11-112.
Identification of stroke centers.

The department shall identify hospitals that meet the criteria set forth in this article as comprehensive, primary, or remote treatment stroke centers. In addition, the department shall be authorized to establish one or more additional levels of stroke centers, in consultation with the Georgia Coverdell Acute Stroke Registry, as necessary based on advancements in medicine and patient care.

A hospital shall apply to the department for such identification and shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that the hospital meets the applicable criteria set forth in or established in accordance with Code Section 31-11-113.

The department shall identify as many hospitals as stroke centers as apply for the identification, provided that each applicant meets the applicable criteria set forth in Code Section 31-11-113 or established by the department.

The department may suspend or revoke a hospital’s identification as a stroke center, after notice and hearing, if the department determines that the hospital is not in compliance with the requirements of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-11-112

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 1102, § 2/SB 549; Ga. L. 2016, p. 438, § 1/HB 853.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 438, § 2/HB 853, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The department shall begin the rulemaking process to effect the provisions of this Act no later than June 30, 2016.”

31-11-113.
Certification; application process; inspections.

A hospital identified as a comprehensive or primary stroke center shall be certified as such by a national health care accreditation body recognized by the department. Any hospital wishing to receive official identification under this subsection shall submit a written application to the department, providing adequate documentation of the hospital’s valid certification as a comprehensive or primary stroke center by any such national health care accreditation body.

Remote treatment stroke centers shall be certified and identified by the department either by certification as an acute stroke-ready hospital by a national health care accreditation body recognized by the department or through an application process to be determined by the department. Said application process shall contain, at minimum, the following requirements:

Remote treatment stroke center certifications and identifications by the department are limited to those hospitals that utilize current and acceptable telemedicine protocols relative to acute stroke treatment as defined by the department;

Upon receipt of complete and proper application for certification as a remote treatment stroke center, the department shall schedule and conduct an inspection of the applicant’s facility no later than 90 days after receipt of application; and

Any hospital, upon certification by the department as a remote treatment stroke center, shall automatically be identified as a remote treatment stroke center and shall be added to the list of such hospitals maintained pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 31-11-115.

Any additional levels of stroke centers established by the department pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 31-11-112 shall be certified by the department in accordance with any criteria and guidelines established by the department in rules and regulations.

Comprehensive and primary stroke centers are encouraged to coordinate, through agreement, with remote treatment stroke centers throughout the state to provide appropriate access to care for acute stroke patients. The coordinating stroke care agreements shall be in writing and include at minimum:

Transfer agreements for the transport and acceptance of all stroke patients seen by the remote treatment stroke center for stroke treatment therapies which the remote treatment stroke center is not capable of providing; and

Communication criteria and protocols with the remote treatment stroke centers.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-11-113

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 1102, § 2/SB 549; Ga. L. 2012, p. 337, § 6/SB 361; Ga. L. 2016, p. 438, § 1/HB 853.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 438, § 2/HB 853, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The department shall begin the rulemaking process to effect the provisions of this Act no later than June 30, 2016.”

31-11-114.
Grants; report.

In order to encourage and ensure the establishment of stroke centers throughout the state, the department shall award grants, subject to appropriations from the General Assembly, to hospitals that seek identification as remote treatment stroke centers and demonstrate a need for financial assistance to develop the necessary infrastructure, including personnel and equipment, in order to satisfy the criteria for identification as a remote treatment stroke center pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section 31-11-113.

A hospital seeking identification as a remote treatment stroke center pursuant to this article may apply to the department for a grant, in a manner and on a form required by the department, and provide such information as the department deems necessary to determine if the hospital is eligible for the grant.

The department may provide grants to as many hospitals as it deems appropriate, subject to appropriations, taking into consideration adequate geographic diversity with respect to locations.

The department shall annually prepare and submit to the Governor, the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the chairpersons of the House Committee on Health and Human Services and the Senate Health and Human Services Committee for distribution to its committee members a report indicating the total number of hospitals that have applied for grants pursuant to this Code section, the number of applicants that have been determined by the department to be eligible for such grants, the total number of grants to be awarded, the name and address of each grantee hospital, the amount of the award to each grantee, and the amount of each award to be disbursed to the grantee.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-11-114

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 1102, § 2/SB 549; Ga. L. 2016, p. 438, § 1/HB 853.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 438, § 2/HB 853, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The department shall begin the rulemaking process to effect the provisions of this Act no later than June 30, 2016.”

31-11-115.
Distribution of list of state identified stroke centers to emergency medical services providers; development of a model stroke triage assessment tool; assessment, treatment, and transport of stroke patients.

Beginning June 1, 2009, and each year thereafter, the department shall send a list of comprehensive, primary, remote treatment, and other level stroke centers identified pursuant to Code Section 31-11-113 to the medical director of each licensed emergency medical services provider in this state, shall maintain a copy of the list in the office designated with the department to oversee emergency medical services, and shall post a list of comprehensive, primary, remote treatment, and other level stroke centers on the department’s website.

The department shall adopt or develop a sample stroke triage assessment tool. The department shall post this sample assessment tool on its website and distribute a copy of the sample assessment tool to each licensed emergency medical services provider no later than December 31, 2008. Each licensed emergency medical services provider shall use a stroke triage assessment tool that is substantially similar to the sample stroke triage assessment tool provided by the department.

The office designated within the department to oversee emergency medical services shall establish protocols related to the assessment, treatment, triage, and transport of stroke patients, including transport to the appropriate level stroke centers, by licensed emergency medical services providers in this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-11-115

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 1102, § 2/SB 549; Ga. L. 2016, p. 438, § 1/HB 853.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, “to” was inserted preceding “the medical director” in subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 438, § 2/HB 853, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The department shall begin the rulemaking process to effect the provisions of this Act no later than June 30, 2016.”

31-11-116.
Annual reports.

In order to assure that the patients are receiving the appropriate level of care and treatment at each level of stroke center in the state, each hospital identified as a stroke center shall annually report information, as specified by the department in its rules and regulations, to the department.

The department shall collect the information reported pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section and shall post such information in the form of a report card annually on the department’s website and present such report to the Office of Health Strategy and Coordination. The results of this report card may be used by the department to conduct training with the identified facilities regarding best practices in the treatment of stroke.

In no way shall this article be construed to require disclosure of any confidential information or other data in violation of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-11-116

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 1102, § 2/SB 549; Ga. L. 2016, p. 438, § 1/HB 853; Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-10/HB 186.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “Office of Health Strategy and Coordination” for “Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives” at end of the first sentence of subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 438, § 2/HB 853, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The department shall begin the rulemaking process to effect the provisions of this Act no later than June 30, 2016.”

Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-1/HB 186, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This part shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Health Act.’ ”

31-11-117.
Statutory construction.

This article shall not be construed to be a medical practice guideline and shall not be used to restrict the authority of a hospital to provide services for which it has received a license under state law. The General Assembly intends that all patients be treated individually based on each patient’s needs and circumstances.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-11-117

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 1102, § 2/SB 549; Ga. L. 2016, p. 438, § 1/HB 853.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 438, § 2/HB 853, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The department shall begin the rulemaking process to effect the provisions of this Act no later than June 30, 2016.”

31-11-118.
Advertising.

A hospital may not advertise to the public, by way of any medium whatsoever, that it is identified by the state as a comprehensive, primary, remote treatment, or other level stroke center unless the hospital has been identified as such by the department pursuant to this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-11-118

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 1102, § 2/SB 549; Ga. L. 2016, p. 438, § 1/HB 853.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 438, § 2/HB 853, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The department shall begin the rulemaking process to effect the provisions of this Act no later than June 30, 2016.”

31-11-119.
Rules and regulations.

The department shall be authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-11-119

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 1102, § 2/SB 549; Ga. L. 2016, p. 438, § 1/HB 853.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 438, § 2/HB 853, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The department shall begin the rulemaking process to effect the provisions of this Act no later than June 30, 2016.”